dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
SFX Aa Y 4
SFX Aa 0       ე/&x1a         .
SFX Aa 0       ე/&x0a         .
SFX Aa 0       ეთ/&x1a        .
SFX Aa 0       ეთ/&x0a        .

SFX Ba Y 4
SFX Ba 0       ი/&x1a         .
SFX Ba 0       ი/&x0a         .
SFX Ba 0       ით/&x1a        .
SFX Ba 0       ით/&x0a        .

SFX aa Y 1
SFX aa 0 ა/&x0a       .

SFX ba Y 1
SFX ba 0 ო/&x0a       .

SFX ka Y 1
SFX ka 0 ეს/&x0a       .

SFX la Y 1
SFX la 0 ნენ/&x0a       .
  
SFX Ac Y 4
SFX Ac 0       ე/&x1c         .
SFX Ac 0       ე/&x0c         .
SFX Ac 0       ეთ/&x1c        .
SFX Ac 0       ეთ/&x0c        .

SFX Bc Y 4
SFX Bc 0       ი/&x1c         .
SFX Bc 0       ი/&x0c         .
SFX Bc 0       ით/&x1c        .
SFX Bc 0       ით/&x0c        .

SFX ac Y 1
SFX ac 0 ა/&x0c       .

SFX bc Y 1
SFX bc 0 ო/&x0c       .

SFX kc Y 1
SFX kc 0 ეს/&x0c       .

SFX lc Y 1
SFX lc 0 ნენ/&x0c       .
  
SFX AE Y 4
SFX AE 0       ე/&x1E         .
SFX AE 0       ე/&x0E         .
SFX AE 0       ეთ/&x1E        .
SFX AE 0       ეთ/&x0E        .

SFX BE Y 4
SFX BE 0       ი/&x1E         .
SFX BE 0       ი/&x0E         .
SFX BE 0       ით/&x1E        .
SFX BE 0       ით/&x0E        .

SFX aE Y 1
SFX aE 0 ა/&x0E       .

SFX bE Y 1
SFX bE 0 ო/&x0E       .

SFX kE Y 1
SFX kE 0 ეს/&x0E       .

SFX lE Y 1
SFX lE 0 ნენ/&x0E       .
  
SFX AG Y 4
SFX AG 0       ე/&x1G         .
SFX AG 0       ე/&x0G         .
SFX AG 0       ეთ/&x1G        .
SFX AG 0       ეთ/&x0G        .

SFX BG Y 4
SFX BG 0       ი/&x1G         .
SFX BG 0       ი/&x0G         .
SFX BG 0       ით/&x1G        .
SFX BG 0       ით/&x0G        .

SFX aG Y 1
SFX aG 0 ა/&x0G       .

SFX bG Y 1
SFX bG 0 ო/&x0G       .

SFX kG Y 1
SFX kG 0 ეს/&x0G       .

SFX lG Y 1
SFX lG 0 ნენ/&x0G       .
  
SFX Ae Y 4
SFX Ae 0       ე/&x1e         .
SFX Ae 0       ე/&x0e         .
SFX Ae 0       ეთ/&x1e        .
SFX Ae 0       ეთ/&x0e        .

SFX Be Y 4
SFX Be 0       ი/&x1e         .
SFX Be 0       ი/&x0e         .
SFX Be 0       ით/&x1e        .
SFX Be 0       ით/&x0e        .

SFX ae Y 1
SFX ae 0 ა/&x0e       .

SFX be Y 1
SFX be 0 ო/&x0e       .

SFX ke Y 1
SFX ke 0 ეს/&x0e       .

SFX le Y 1
SFX le 0 ნენ/&x0e       .
  
SFX Ag Y 4
SFX Ag 0       ე/&x1g         .
SFX Ag 0       ე/&x0g         .
SFX Ag 0       ეთ/&x1g        .
SFX Ag 0       ეთ/&x0g        .

SFX Bg Y 4
SFX Bg 0       ი/&x1g         .
SFX Bg 0       ი/&x0g         .
SFX Bg 0       ით/&x1g        .
SFX Bg 0       ით/&x0g        .

SFX ag Y 1
SFX ag 0 ა/&x0g       .

SFX bg Y 1
SFX bg 0 ო/&x0g       .

SFX kg Y 1
SFX kg 0 ეს/&x0g       .

SFX lg Y 1
SFX lg 0 ნენ/&x0g       .
  
SFX AX Y 4
SFX AX 0       ე/&x1X         .
SFX AX 0       ე/&x0X         .
SFX AX 0       ეთ/&x1X        .
SFX AX 0       ეთ/&x0X        .

SFX BX Y 4
SFX BX 0       ი/&x1X         .
SFX BX 0       ი/&x0X         .
SFX BX 0       ით/&x1X        .
SFX BX 0       ით/&x0X        .

SFX aX Y 1
SFX aX 0 ა/&x0X       .

SFX bX Y 1
SFX bX 0 ო/&x0X       .

SFX kX Y 1
SFX kX 0 ეს/&x0X       .

SFX lX Y 1
SFX lX 0 ნენ/&x0X       .
  
SFX Ax Y 4
SFX Ax 0       ე/&x1x         .
SFX Ax 0       ე/&x0x         .
SFX Ax 0       ეთ/&x1x        .
SFX Ax 0       ეთ/&x0x        .

SFX Bx Y 4
SFX Bx 0       ი/&x1x         .
SFX Bx 0       ი/&x0x         .
SFX Bx 0       ით/&x1x        .
SFX Bx 0       ით/&x0x        .

SFX ax Y 1
SFX ax 0 ა/&x0x       .

SFX bx Y 1
SFX bx 0 ო/&x0x       .

SFX kx Y 1
SFX kx 0 ეს/&x0x       .

SFX lx Y 1
SFX lx 0 ნენ/&x0x       .
  
SFX AW Y 4
SFX AW 0       ე/&x1W         .
SFX AW 0       ე/&x0W         .
SFX AW 0       ეთ/&x1W        .
SFX AW 0       ეთ/&x0W        .

SFX BW Y 4
SFX BW 0       ი/&x1W         .
SFX BW 0       ი/&x0W         .
SFX BW 0       ით/&x1W        .
SFX BW 0       ით/&x0W        .

SFX aW Y 1
SFX aW 0 ა/&x0W       .

SFX bW Y 1
SFX bW 0 ო/&x0W       .

SFX kW Y 1
SFX kW 0 ეს/&x0W       .

SFX lW Y 1
SFX lW 0 ნენ/&x0W       .
  
SFX Aw Y 4
SFX Aw 0       ე/&x1w         .
SFX Aw 0       ე/&x0w         .
SFX Aw 0       ეთ/&x1w        .
SFX Aw 0       ეთ/&x0w        .

SFX Bw Y 4
SFX Bw 0       ი/&x1w         .
SFX Bw 0       ი/&x0w         .
SFX Bw 0       ით/&x1w        .
SFX Bw 0       ით/&x0w        .

SFX aw Y 1
SFX aw 0 ა/&x0w       .

SFX bw Y 1
SFX bw 0 ო/&x0w       .

SFX kw Y 1
SFX kw 0 ეს/&x0w       .

SFX lw Y 1
SFX lw 0 ნენ/&x0w       .
  
SFX An Y 4
SFX An 0       ე/&x1n         .
SFX An 0       ე/&x0n         .
SFX An 0       ეთ/&x1n        .
SFX An 0       ეთ/&x0n        .

SFX Bn Y 4
SFX Bn 0       ი/&x1n         .
SFX Bn 0       ი/&x0n         .
SFX Bn 0       ით/&x1n        .
SFX Bn 0       ით/&x0n        .

SFX an Y 1
SFX an 0 ა/&x0n       .

SFX bn Y 1
SFX bn 0 ო/&x0n       .

SFX kn Y 1
SFX kn 0 ეს/&x0n       .

SFX ln Y 1
SFX ln 0 ნენ/&x0n       .
  
SFX AN Y 4
SFX AN 0       ე/&x1N         .
SFX AN 0       ე/&x0N         .
SFX AN 0       ეთ/&x1N        .
SFX AN 0       ეთ/&x0N        .

SFX BN Y 4
SFX BN 0       ი/&x1N         .
SFX BN 0       ი/&x0N         .
SFX BN 0       ით/&x1N        .
SFX BN 0       ით/&x0N        .

SFX aN Y 1
SFX aN 0 ა/&x0N       .

SFX bN Y 1
SFX bN 0 ო/&x0N       .

SFX kN Y 1
SFX kN 0 ეს/&x0N       .

SFX lN Y 1
SFX lN 0 ნენ/&x0N       .
  

############
# Optative #
############



SFX OI Y 6
SFX OI 0       ო/&x1I        .
SFX OI 0       ო/&x0I        .
SFX OI 0       ოს/&x0I       .
SFX OI 0       ოთ/&x1I       .
SFX OI 0       ოთ/&x0I       .
SFX OI 0       ონ/&x0I       .
  
SFX Oo Y 6
SFX Oo 0       ო/&x1o        .
SFX Oo 0       ო/&x0o        .
SFX Oo 0       ოს/&x0o       .
SFX Oo 0       ოთ/&x1o       .
SFX Oo 0       ოთ/&x0o       .
SFX Oo 0       ონ/&x0o       .
  
SFX OA Y 6
SFX OA 0       ო/&x1A        .
SFX OA 0       ო/&x0A        .
SFX OA 0       ოს/&x0A       .
SFX OA 0       ოთ/&x1A       .
SFX OA 0       ოთ/&x0A       .
SFX OA 0       ონ/&x0A       .
  
SFX OC Y 6
SFX OC 0       ო/&x1C        .
SFX OC 0       ო/&x0C        .
SFX OC 0       ოს/&x0C       .
SFX OC 0       ოთ/&x1C       .
SFX OC 0       ოთ/&x0C       .
SFX OC 0       ონ/&x0C       .
  
SFX Oa Y 6
SFX Oa 0       ო/&x1a        .
SFX Oa 0       ო/&x0a        .
SFX Oa 0       ოს/&x0a       .
SFX Oa 0       ოთ/&x1a       .
SFX Oa 0       ოთ/&x0a       .
SFX Oa 0       ონ/&x0a       .
  
SFX Oc Y 6
SFX Oc 0       ო/&x1c        .
SFX Oc 0       ო/&x0c        .
SFX Oc 0       ოს/&x0c       .
SFX Oc 0       ოთ/&x1c       .
SFX Oc 0       ოთ/&x0c       .
SFX Oc 0       ონ/&x0c       .
  
SFX OE Y 6
SFX OE 0       ო/&x1E        .
SFX OE 0       ო/&x0E        .
SFX OE 0       ოს/&x0E       .
SFX OE 0       ოთ/&x1E       .
SFX OE 0       ოთ/&x0E       .
SFX OE 0       ონ/&x0E       .
  
SFX OG Y 6
SFX OG 0       ო/&x1G        .
SFX OG 0       ო/&x0G        .
SFX OG 0       ოს/&x0G       .
SFX OG 0       ოთ/&x1G       .
SFX OG 0       ოთ/&x0G       .
SFX OG 0       ონ/&x0G       .
  
SFX Oe Y 6
SFX Oe 0       ო/&x1e        .
SFX Oe 0       ო/&x0e        .
SFX Oe 0       ოს/&x0e       .
SFX Oe 0       ოთ/&x1e       .
SFX Oe 0       ოთ/&x0e       .
SFX Oe 0       ონ/&x0e       .
  
SFX Og Y 6
SFX Og 0       ო/&x1g        .
SFX Og 0       ო/&x0g        .
SFX Og 0       ოს/&x0g       .
SFX Og 0       ოთ/&x1g       .
SFX Og 0       ოთ/&x0g       .
SFX Og 0       ონ/&x0g       .
  
SFX OX Y 6
SFX OX 0       ო/&x1X        .
SFX OX 0       ო/&x0X        .
SFX OX 0       ოს/&x0X       .
SFX OX 0       ოთ/&x1X       .
SFX OX 0       ოთ/&x0X       .
SFX OX 0       ონ/&x0X       .
  
SFX Ox Y 6
SFX Ox 0       ო/&x1x        .
SFX Ox 0       ო/&x0x        .
SFX Ox 0       ოს/&x0x       .
SFX Ox 0       ოთ/&x1x       .
SFX Ox 0       ოთ/&x0x       .
SFX Ox 0       ონ/&x0x       .
  
SFX OW Y 6
SFX OW 0       ო/&x1W        .
SFX OW 0       ო/&x0W        .
SFX OW 0       ოს/&x0W       .
SFX OW 0       ოთ/&x1W       .
SFX OW 0       ოთ/&x0W       .
SFX OW 0       ონ/&x0W       .
  
SFX Ow Y 6
SFX Ow 0       ო/&x1w        .
SFX Ow 0       ო/&x0w        .
SFX Ow 0       ოს/&x0w       .
SFX Ow 0       ოთ/&x1w       .
SFX Ow 0       ოთ/&x0w       .
SFX Ow 0       ონ/&x0w       .
  
