dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
აგზავნ/OGAGaGkG&v
აგრძელ/OGAGaGkG&v
ად/Anbnkn
ადევნ/OIONAnankn&v
ადუღ/OA&v
აერთ/OEAEaEkE&v
ავალ/OnAnankn
ავლ/AGbGkGAWbWkWAnbnkn
ათა/NSNNOG
ათავისუფლ/OGAGaGkG&v
ათენ/AGaGkG
ათხოვ/OI&v
აკეთ/OGOXONAGaGkGANaNkN&v
აკისრ/Anankn&v
აკუთვნ/OI&v
ამაღლ/OA&v
ამახვილ/OG&v
ამზად/OoOEOn&v
ამთავრ/OnAnankn&v
ამოწმ/OEAEaEkE&v
ამტვრი/Oe&v
ამუშა/OAOn&v
ამყარ/OGOnAnankn&v
ამცირ/OE&v
ანადგურ/OGAGaGkG&v
ანაცვლ/OX&v
ანდ/OIOG
ანიშნ/OION&v
აპატი/ONANaNkN&v
აპატიმრ/OnAnankn&v
აპყრ/OI&v
არგ/Oo&v
არიდ/OAOG&v
არკვი/OGAGaGkG&v
არქვ/TnBnankn&v
არჩი/OEOGOgONAEaEkEAGaGkGANaNkN&v
არჩინ/OXONAXaXkX&v
ასაბუთ/OnAnankn&v
ასვ/TNBNaNkN&v
ასვენ/Anankn&v
ასწავლ/OEONANaNkN&v
ასწორ/Og&v
ასხ/TnBcackc&v
ატან/PNAGaGkGAnankn
ატირ/OA&v
ატყუ/Oo&v
აუპატიურ/AGaGkG&v
აუწყ/ONANaNkN&v
აფარ/OEOXAEaEkE&v
აფართო/OG&v
აფიქსირ/OnAnankn&v
აფრთხილ/AGbGkG&v
აფრინ/ANaNkN&v
აფუძნ/Anankn&v
აფუჭ/AGaGkG&v
აქ/OEON
აქსოვ/OC&v
აღ/OGAGaGkGAgbgkg
აღებინ/OI&v
აღვიძ/OGAGaGkG&v
აყალიბ/OcAcackc&v
აყარ/OXAEaEkEAnankn&v
აყოლ/OIAGaGkGAnankn&v
აშავ/Anankn&v
აშენ/OA&v
აშურ/OI&v
აშუქ/OG&v
აჩერ/OEOGAGaGkG&v
აჩინ/AGbGkG&v
აჩუქ/ONANaNkN&v
აცალ/OW&v
აცნობიერ/OGAGaGkG&v
აცხ/Og&v
აწარმო/ONANaNkN&v
აწვ/Ananln&v
აწოდ/OI&v
აწუხ/OEAEaEkE&v
აწყვეტინ/AEbEkE&v
აჭარბ/AXaXkX&v
ახ/OEON
ახმარ/PNOo
გზავნ/OGAGaGkGAgagkg&v
გმ/OnAnankn&v
ე/BNaNkN&v
ებ/ToTNBEaElEBGaGlG
ებრძოლ/ONAEbElE&v
ეგუ/OE&v
ევედრ/ANaNlN&v
ეზიარ/ANbNlN&v
ეთანხმ/OnAnanln&v
ეთხოვ/OgAgaglg&v
ელაპარაკ/OoONANaNlN&v
ემგზავრ/OGAGaGlG&v
ემორჩილ/OnAnanln&v
ემსახურ/OoON&v
ემსგავს/OnAnanln&v
ემუქრ/Ananln&v
ენდ/OION
ერგ/Oo
ეს/BNaNkN
ესმ/BNaNkN&v
ესროლ/ONANaNkN&v
ეუფლ/Anbnln&v
ეფარ/Aaaala&v
ეყარ/OX&v
ეშურ/AGbGlG&v
ეცალ/AGaGlG&v
ეჭიდ/OC&v
ეხ/OEAEaElE
ეხმარ/OIOnAnanln&v
ზარდ/OGOgAgagkg&v
თარგმნ/ANaNkN&v
თქვ/TgTNBgagkg&v
თხარ/Oa&v
თხოვ/PNOoONANaNkN
იაზრ/OoOGAGaGkG&v
იანგარიშ/ONANaNkN&v
იბ/BEaElE
იბან/Anbnkn&v
იბრძოლ/ONANaNkN&v
იგემ/ONANaNkN&v
იგვიან/Anbnkn&v
იგნ/OEAEaEkE&v
ითამაშ/OGONANaNkN&v
ითვალ/OgOn&v
ითვალისწინ/OGAGaGkG&v
იკადრ/ONANaNkN&v
იკავ/OEOnAEaEkE&v
იკარგ/OnAXaXlXAnanln&v
იკვლი/OgAgagkg&v
ილაპარაკ/OoONANaNkN&v
ილაშქრ/ANaNkN&v
იმართ/OGAGaGlG&v
იმაღლ/OA&v
იმორჩილ/Anankn&v
იმოქმედ/OoON&v
იმსახურ/OnONAnankn&v
იმუშა/OEOgON&v
ინ/ONBNaNkN
ინან/ONAEbEkE&v
ინაცვლ/OX&v
ინახ/OEOnAEaEkEAnankn&v
ინახულ/OoONANaNkN&v
იპარ/AGaGlG&v
იპოვნ/ONANaNkN&v
იპყრ/OIOnTETN&v
ირ/TNANbNkN
ირიდ/OA&v
ირქვ/Bnankn&v
ირწმუნ/ONANaNkN&v
ისაჯ/OnAnanln&v
ისესხ/ANaNkN&v
ისვ/Bnankn
ისველ/AGbGkG&v
ისტუმრ/OGAGaGkG&v
ისწავ/ANaNkN&v
ისწავლ/OEONAEaEkEANaNkN&v
იტანჯ/AnanlnANbNlN&v
იტრუნ/AGaGlG&v
იტყვ/AEaEkE&v
იფარ/OcOnAEaEkEAXaXkX&v
იფარგლ/Oe&v
იქნი/Oo&v
იღალ/Anbnln&v
იღვიძ/OGAgagkg&v
იღუპ/OnAnanln&v
იყენ/OgAgagkg&v
იყვირ/ONAnbnknANaNkN&v
იყუარ/OEAEaEkE&v
იყუჩ/ANaNkN&v
იშენ/OA&v
იშოვ/ONANaNkN&v
იშოვნ/ONANaNkN&v
იშურ/Anbnkn&v
იჩინ/OGOgAGaGkGAgagkg&v
იცვალ/Ogog&v
იცილ/OoOA&v
იცნ/OGOgONTNBNaNkN&v
იცხოვრ/ONANaNkN&v
იძახ/AwawkwAnankn&v
იძი/OoOgONANaNkN&v
იწი/AGaGkGAwbwkwAnankn&v
იწონ/Oo&v
იწყ/OnONAwbwkwAnanknANaNkN&v
იწყალ/OEAEaElE&v
იწყნარ/OE&v
იჭირ/OnAnankn&v
იხად/OoOGOX&v
იხარ/OGAGaGkGAnbnln&v
იხედ/OoOCOE&v
იხსენ/OGAGaGkG
იჯერ/OnAnankn&v
კეტ/OCOnAnankn&v
კიდ/Oo
კრთ/BEaElE&v
კუმშ/OE&v
ლ/OWONTATN&v
ლახ/OXAGaGkGAXaXkX&v
მალ/OnAXaXkXAnankn
მუსრ/OEAEaEkE&v
ნიშნ/OnAEaEkE&v
რ/OAOE&v
რჩ/ooonBcackcBXaXkX&v
სახ/OgOn
სერ/AXaXkX
სთქვ/TNBNaNkN&v
სინჯ/OoOGAGaGkG&v
სტრ/OA
სცად/ANbNkN&v
სძლ/ANbNkN&v
სწირ/OEAEaEkE&v
სწყდ/AGaGlG&v
უამბ/ONANaNkN&v
უდგ/oIoEAgaglg&v
უთმ/OnAnankn&v
უმზად/OG&v
უპასუხ/ONANaNkN&v
ურბინ/Oe&v
ურეკ/Anankn&v
ურთ/Anbnkn&v
ური/OA
უსაბამ/OE&v
უსწრ/OI&v
უტოვ/OnAnankn&v
უფრთხილდ/AGaGlG&v
უყალიბ/Oc&v
უყარ/Oo&v
უშალ/OEAEaEkE&v
უშველ/ONANaNkN&v
უჩვენ/ONANaNkN&v
უძახ/Anbnkn&v
უწყ/OEAnbnkn&v
უწყვ/AEaEkE&v
უხად/OX&v
უხმ/ANbNkN&v
უჯერ/Anbnkn&v
ფარგლ/Oe&v
ფინ/OoOg
ქმნ/TETNBEaEkEANaNkN&v
ღერღ/Aaaaka&v
ღვარ/OnONAnanknANaNkN&v
ყარ/OEOXAXaXkX
შალ/OGOnONAGaGkGAXaXkXAWaWkW
შიგნ/Agagkg
შინჯ/OG&v
ჩეხ/OX&v
ჩქმალ/OI&v
ცალ/Anankn
წი/OAOG
წირ/OEOGAEaEkEAGaGkG&v
წყვიტ/OEOGOXAEaEkEAXaXkX&v
ჭრ/ToTgTXBXaXkX&v
ხარ/OG
ხატ/OgOnAgagkgAnankn
ხდ/AGaGlG&v
ხედ/OIOCOEOX
ჰბრკოლდ/Anankn&v
ჰკადრ/OEONANaNkN&v
ჰკარგ/Anbnkn&v
ჰპოვ/ANbNkN&v
ჰყარ/Anankn&v
